Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-2546
Bonds, property, and income; exempt from taxes; when.

(1) All bonds of a joint public agency are declared to be issued for an essential public and governmental purpose and, together with interest thereon and income therefrom, shall be exempt from all taxes.

(2) The property of a joint public agency, including any pro rata share of any property owned by a joint public agency in conjunction with any other person, is declared to be public property of a governmental subdivision of the state. Such property and the income of a joint public agency shall be exempt from all taxes and assessments of the state or any political subdivision of the state if used for a public purpose.

Laws 1999, LB 87, § 46;

Laws 2001, LB 173, § 12.